Maryland, session 2025, SB0440.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
9–114.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ADVISORY BOARD” MEANS THE OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR
GENERAL ADVISORY BOARD.
(3) “OFFICE” MEANS THE OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0440*

SENATE BILL 440
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY.
(C) THE COUNTY COUNCIL SHALL ESTABLISH AN OFFICE OF THE
INSPECTOR GENERAL IN THE COUNTY.
(D) THE COUNTY COUNCIL SHALL:
(1) ENACT A LOCAL LAW THAT ESTABLISHES:
(I) THE QUALIFICATIONS FOR THE INSPECTOR GENERAL;
(II) THE TERM OF OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL;
(III) THE POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE OFFICE; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER REQUIREMENT THE COUNTY COUNCIL
CONSIDERS NECESSARY FOR THE OPERATION OF THE OFFICE; AND
(2) INCLUDE IN THE COUNTY’S ANNUAL OPERATING BUDGET
PROPOSAL A PROJECTED BUDGET FOR THE OFFICE FOR THE UPCOMING FISCAL
YEAR.
(E) (1) THERE IS AN OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL ADVISORY
BOARD IN THE COUNTY.
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
ADVISORY BOARD CONSISTS OF SEVEN MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE COUNTY
EXECUTIVE AND SUBJECT TO CONFIRMATION BY THE COUNTY COUNCIL.
(3) A MEMBER OF THE ADVISORY BOARD MAY NOT BE AN ELECTED
OFFICIAL OR EMPLOYEE OF:
(I) THE STATE;
(II) THE COUNTY; OR
(III) ANY OTHER FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT.
(4) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
ADVISORY BOARD:

SENATE BILL 440 3
1. SHALL SELECT AND APPOINT THE INSPECTOR
GENERAL; AND
2. MAY REMOVE THE INSPECTOR GENERAL ONLY FOR
NEGLECT OF DUTY, MALFEASANCE, CONVICTION OF A FELONY, OR OTHER GOOD
CAUSE.
(II) AN AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF A MAJORITY OF THE ADVISORY
BOARD IS NECESSARY FOR THE SELECTION, APPOINTMENT, OR REMOVAL OF THE
INSPECTOR GENERAL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.